Wyoming, session 2026, HB0030.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 31-3-101(a)(i)(F) and by creating new
subparagraphs (G) and (H) is amended to read:

31-3-101. Registration fees; exemptions.

(a) Except as otherwise provided, the following fees
shall accompany each application for the registration of a
vehicle:

HB0030

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0065
(i) A county registration fee computed as
follows, or five dollars ($5.00), whichever is greater:

(F) 3% of 15% of the factory price plus
special equipment value for a vehicle in its sixth year of
service; and thereafter.

(G) 3% of 10% of the factory price plus
special equipment value for a vehicle in its seventh year
of service;

(H) 3% of 5% of the factory price plus
special equipment value for a vehicle in its eighth year of
service and thereafter.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0030